Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.146

Combination of offices of treasurer with clerk—Powers of treasurer.

In the event that the office of clerk is combined with the office of treasurer so as to become the office of treasurer-clerk, the treasurer shall exercise all the powers vested in and perform all the duties required to be performed by the clerk.

[ 1969 c 116 s 5. Formerly RCW 35.24.146.]